Iowa, session 2025-2026, 1421XD.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA:
TLSB 1421XD (7) 91
da/jh

S.F. _____ H.F. _____
Section 1. Section 490.122, subsection 1, paragraph ad,
Code 2025, is amended by striking the paragraph.
Sec. 2. Section 490.122, Code 2025, is amended by adding the
following new subsection:
NEW SUBSECTION. 4. The secretary of state may impose,
assess, and collect a filing fee as a condition to accepting a
biennial report as provided in section 490.1621.
Sec. 3. Section 490.1621, subsection 4, Code 2025, is
amended to read as follows:
4. The first biennial report shall must be delivered to
the secretary of state between January 1 and April 1 of the
first even-numbered year following the calendar year in which a
domestic corporation was incorporated or a foreign corporation
was registered to do business in this state. Subsequent A
biennial reports report must be delivered to the secretary
of state between January 1 and April 1 of the each following
even-numbered calendar years year. For purposes of this
section, each A filing fee for the biennial report shall be
determined by the secretary of state pursuant to section
490.122. The biennial report shall contain information related
to the two-year period immediately preceding the calendar year
in which the report is filed.